Utah statutes.
75-3-305.   Informal probate -- Registrar not satisfied.
If the registrar is not satisfied that a will is entitled to be probated in
informal proceedings because of failure to meet the requirements of Sections
75-3-303 and 75-3-304 or any other reason, he may decline the application. A
declination of informal probate is not an adjudication and does not preclude
formal probate proceedings.
